Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.46.060

Request for review of action—Stay of action—Orders subject to review.

During the period of the supervisory direction and during the period of conservatorship, the bank may request the director to review an action taken or proposed to be taken by the representative or conservator; specifying wherein the action complained of is believed not to be in the best interest of the bank, and such request shall stay the action specified pending review of such action by the director. Any order entered by the director appointing a representative and providing that the bank shall not do certain acts as provided in RCW 30A.46.030 and 30A.46.040, any order entered by the director appointing a conservator, and any order by the director following the review of an action of the representative or conservator as herein above provided shall be subject to review in accordance with the administrative procedure act of the state of Washington.

[ 2014 c 37 s 249; 2013 c 76 s 18; 1994 c 92 s 138; 1975 1st ex.s. c 87 s 6. Formerly RCW 30.46.060.]